Illinois, session 104th, SB4063.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5adding Division 31.2 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/Art. 11 Div. 31.2 heading new)7DIVISION 31.2. BUILDING INSPECTIONS 8    (65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-1 new)9    Sec. 11-31.2-1. Findings and purpose.10    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that:11        (1) uncertain and lengthy building permit review and 12    inspection timelines add costs, delay community 13    investment, and make it harder to deliver housing across 14    the State;15        (2) ensuring predictable, efficient, and transparent 16    review processes is a matter of statewide concern 17    affecting housing supply, public safety, and economic 18    competitiveness;19        (3) several states, including Florida, Arizona, 20    Tennessee, Texas, and New Hampshire, have adopted 21    third-party plan review and inspection systems that 22    accelerate development timelines while maintaining safety   SB4063- 2 -LRB104 20891 RTM 34565 b1    and code compliance; and2        (4) By setting statewide expectations and offering 3    qualified third-party review options when local deadlines 4    are exceeded, Illinois can reduce avoidable delays and 5    help advance needed housing and commercial development in 6    communities large and small.7    (b) It is the purpose of this Division to create a 8statewide third-party plan review and inspection framework, to 9establish uniform municipal deadlines, and to ensure that all 10applicants may obtain timely approvals necessary to advance 11construction while maintaining public safety and building-code 12standards. 13    (65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-2 new)14    Sec. 11-31.2-2. Definitions. As used in this Act:15    "Business day" means any day other than a Saturday, 16Sunday, or State-recognized holiday.17    "Complete application" means an application that includes 18all forms, fees, documents, site plans, and other materials 19required by local ordinance.20    "Qualified third-party plan reviewer" means a person who:21        (1) is a licensed architect or engineer under the laws 22    of this State; and23        (2) holds a current and active certification issued by 24    the International Code Council, the National Fire 25    Protection Association, or the International Association   SB4063- 3 -LRB104 20891 RTM 34565 b1    of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials, or one of their 2    successor organizations.3    "Qualified third-party inspector" means a person who:4        (1) is a licensed architect or engineer; and5        (2) holds a current and active certification issued by 6    the International Code Council, the National Fire 7    Protection Association, or the International Association 8    of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials, or one of their 9    successor organizations. 10    (65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-5 new)11    Sec. 11-31.2-5. Applicability. This Division applies to 12all municipalities, including home-rule units. 13    (65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-10 new)14    Sec. 11-31.2-10. Municipal plan review timelines.15    (a) A municipality shall complete its initial plan review 16within:17        (1) 15 business days after receipt of a complete 18    application for a one-family residential project or 19    2-family residential project; or20        (2) 30 business days after receipt of a complete 21    application for any multifamily, mixed-use, or commercial 22    project.23    (b) A municipality shall issue written comments or 24approval within the applicable deadline.  SB4063- 4 -LRB104 20891 RTM 34565 b1    (c) For any subsequent review cycle after the applicant 2submits revisions responding to comments, the municipality 3shall complete review within 10 business days.4    (d) Failure to meet any deadline under this Section 5triggers the applicant's right to use a qualified third-party 6plan reviewer under Section 11-31.2-20. 7    (65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-15 new)8    Sec. 11-31.2-15. Inspection timelines.9    (a) A municipality shall conduct any required inspection 10within 2 business days after receipt of a request.11    (b) Failure to conduct the inspection within the required 12period triggers the applicant's right to use a qualified 13third-party inspector under Section 11-31.2-25. 14    (65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-20 new)15    Sec. 11-31.2-20. Use of qualified third-party plan 16reviewers upon missed deadline.17    (a) If a municipality fails to complete its plan review 18within the deadlines established under Section 11-31.2-10, 19then the applicant may retain a qualified third-party plan 20reviewer.21    (b) A municipality shall accept any plan review submitted 22by a qualified third-party plan reviewer as meeting the 23municipality's requirements if the review demonstrates 24compliance with the applicable building codes.  SB4063- 5 -LRB104 20891 RTM 34565 b1    (c) A municipality shall issue the permit within 2 2business days after receiving a compliant third-party plan 3review.4    (d) A municipality may not require a second review, impose 5additional comments, or delay issuance once a qualified review 6has been submitted, except as permitted under Section 711-31.2-30. 8    (65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-25 new)9    Sec. 11-31.2-25. Use of qualified third-party inspectors 10upon missed deadline.11    (a) If a municipality fails to conduct a required 12inspection within 2 business days, then the applicant may 13retain a qualified third-party inspector.14    (b) Municipalities shall accept inspection reports 15submitted under this Section as satisfying local inspection 16requirements if the report demonstrates compliance with the 17building code.18    (c) A municipality shall issue any required approval, 19certificate, or authorization within one business day after 20receiving a compliant inspection report. 21    (65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-30 new)22    Sec. 11-31.2-30. Municipal audit authority.23    (a) A municipality retains full authority to audit any 24third-party plan review or inspection for compliance with   SB4063- 6 -LRB104 20891 RTM 34565 b1applicable codes. Nothing in this Division limits a 2municipality's authority to issue stop-work orders, withhold 3certificates of occupancy, or pursue enforcement actions for 4noncompliance.5    (b) An audit may not delay issuance of a permit or 6authorization submitted under Section 11-31.2-20 or 711-31.2-25.8    (c) If a municipality identifies material noncompliance, 9then it may pursue enforcement actions available under its 10code authority and report the findings to the Department of 11Financial and Professional Regulation or applicable 12credentialing organization.13    (d) A municipality may require reasonable documentation 14demonstrating that a qualified third-party plan reviewer or 15qualified third-party inspector meets the qualification 16requirements of this Division, including proof that the 17qualified third-party plan reviewer's or qualified third-party 18inspector's licensure or certification is current and active.19    (e) Nothing in this Division shall be construed to 20transfer liability for code compliance or construction defects 21from the owner, design professional, or contractor. 22    (65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-40 new)23    Sec. 11-31.2-40. Fees; fee parity.24    (a) A municipality may not charge plan review or 25inspection fees for any portion of the review process or   SB4063- 7 -LRB104 20891 RTM 34565 b1inspection process performed by a qualified third-party plan 2reviewer or qualified third-party inspector.3    (b) Fees charged by a qualified third-party plan reviewer 4may not exceed the municipality's standard fees for the same 5service.6    (c) A municipality shall reduce its fees proportionally 7when an applicant uses third-party review for only one portion 8of the process. 9    (65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-45 new)10    Sec. 11-31.2-45. Conflicts of interest.11    (a) A qualified third-party plan reviewer may not review 12plans if:13        (1) the qualified third-party plan reviewer, an 14    employee of the qualified third-party plan reviewer, or 15    qualified third-party plan reviewer's employer was 16    involved in making the plans; or17        (2) the plans are for work to be performed on property 18    owned by the qualified third-party plan reviewer, an 19    employee of the qualified third-party plan reviewer, or 20    qualified third-party plan reviewer's employer.21    (b) A qualified third-party inspector may not inspect work 22if the qualified third-party inspector, an employee of the 23qualified third-party inspector, or qualified third-party 24inspector's employer:25        (1) performed any of the work;  SB4063- 8 -LRB104 20891 RTM 34565 b1        (2) planned any of the work; or2        (3) is the owner of the property on which the work was 3    performed.4    (c) A qualified third-party plan reviewer or qualified 5third-party inspector shall disclose any potential conflict of 6interest to the applicant and the municipality before 7accepting an engagement. 8    (65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-50 new)9    Sec. 11-31.2-50. Home rule preemption. A home rule unit 10may not regulate plan reviews or building inspections in a 11manner inconsistent with this Division. This Division is a 12limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of 13the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by home 14rule units of powers and functions exercised by the State. 15    (65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-97 new)16    Sec. 11-31.2-97. Severability. The provisions of this 17Division are severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on 18Statutes.  SB4063- 9 -LRB104 20891 RTM 34565 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    65 ILCS 5/Art. 11 Div. 4    31.2 heading new5    65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-1 new6    65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-2 new7    65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-5 new8    65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-10 new9    65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-15 new10    65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-20 new11    65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-25 new12    65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-30 new13    65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-40 new14    65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-45 new15    65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-50 new16    65 ILCS 5/11-31.2-97 new